Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-140
Signs and handbills; regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power to regulate and prevent the use of streets, sidewalks, and public grounds for signs, sign posts, racks, and the posting of handbills and advertisements.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5034;

C.S.1922, § 4203;

C.S.1929, § 17-142;

R.S.1943, § 17-140;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 32.
August 24, 2017
City of second class has authority by ordinance to regulate and prevent use of sidewalks and streets and to remove obstructions therefrom, but such body cannot act arbitrarily and deny one citizen privileges which it grants to others. City of Pierce v. Schramm, 116 Neb. 263, 216 N.W. 809 (1927).

Municipalities may grant the use of streets to telephone company for its poles and lines. City of Plattsmouth v. Nebraska Telephone Co., 80 Neb. 460, 114 N.W. 588 (1908).

The term "public roads" does not include streets and alleys of a municipality, and the unauthorized use of such thoroughfares constitutes a public nuisance. Nebraska Telephone Co. v. Western Independent Long Distance Telephone Co., 68 Neb. 772, 95 N.W. 18 (1903).